test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - šaddo: # ok PARGO
    šaddo+N+Sg+Nom:  šaddo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Gen:  šaˊdo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Acc:  šaˊdo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Ill:  šaadon
    šaddo+N+Sg+Loc:  šaddoost
    šaddo+N+Sg+Com:  šaddoin
    šaddo+N+Sg+Abe:  šaˊdottáá
    šaddo+N+Ess:  šaddon
    šaddo+N+Par:  šaddod
    šaddo+N+Pl+Nom:  šaˊdoh
    šaddo+N+Pl+Gen:  šaˊdoi
    šaddo+N+Pl+Acc:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Ill:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Loc:  šaˊdoin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Com:  šaˊdoiguin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Abe:  šaˊdoittáá

  Noun - pargo: # ok PARGO
    pargo+N+Sg+Nom:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Gen:  paˊrgo
    pargo+N+Sg+Acc:  paˊrgo
    pargo+N+Sg+Ill:  paargon
    pargo+N+Sg+Loc:  pargoost
    pargo+N+Sg+Com:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Sg+Abe:  paˊrgottáá
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargon
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargod
    pargo+N+Pl+Nom:  paˊrgoh
    pargo+N+Pl+Gen:  paˊrgoi
    pargo+N+Pl+Acc:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Ill:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Loc:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Pl+Com:  paˊrgoiguin
    pargo+N+Pl+Abe:  paˊrgoittáá


  Noun - avdo:
    avdo+N+Sg+Nom:  avdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Gen:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Acc:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Ill:  aavdon
    avdo+N+Sg+Loc:  aavdost
    avdo+N+Sg+Com:  avdoin
    avdo+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊvdottáá
    avdo+N+Ess:  avdon
    avdo+N+Par:  avdod
    avdo+N+Pl+Nom:  aavdoh
    avdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [aavdoi, aˊvdoi]
    avdo+N+Pl+Acc:  aavdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Ill:  aavdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Loc:  aavdoin
    avdo+N+Pl+Com:  aˊvdoiguin
    avdo+N+Pl+Abe:  aˊvdoittáá

  Noun - taŋgo:  # ok APINA
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  taŋgost
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  taŋgottáá
    taŋgo+N+Ess:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Par:  taŋgod
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  taŋgoh
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  taŋgoi
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  taŋgoiguin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  taŋgoittáá


  Noun - taho: # ok TAHO
    taho+N+Sg+Nom:  taˊho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen:  taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Acc:  taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill:  tahon
    taho+N+Sg+Loc:  tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com:  tavvoin
    taho+N+Sg+Abe:  taˊṿottáá
    taho+N+Ess:  tahhoon
    taho+N+Par: tahhood
    taho+N+Pl+Nom:  taˊṿoh
    taho+N+Pl+Gen:  taˊṿoi
    taho+N+Pl+Acc:  taˊṿoid
    taho+N+Pl+Ill:  tavvoid
    taho+N+Pl+Loc:  taˊṿoin
    taho+N+Pl+Com:  taˊṿoiguin
    taho+N+Pl+Abe:  taˊṿoittáá

  Noun - vašo: # TAHO
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom:  vaˊṣ̌o
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen:  vaˊšo
    vašo+N+Sg+Acc:  vaˊšo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill:  vaˊṣ̌on
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com:  vašoin
    vašo+N+Sg+Abe:  vaˊšottáá
    vašo+N+Ess:  vaššoon
    vašo+N+Par: vaššood 
    vašo+N+Pl+Nom:  vašoh
    vašo+N+Pl+Gen:  vaˊšoi
    vašo+N+Pl+Acc:  vaˊšoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Ill:  vaˊšoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Loc:  vaˊšoin
    vašo+N+Pl+Com:  vaˊšoiguin
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe:  vaˊšoittáá



  Noun - lajo: # ok LAJO
    lajo+N+Sg+Nom:  laˊj̣o
    lajo+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊjo
    lajo+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊjo
    lajo+N+Sg+Ill:  laˊj̣on
    lajo+N+Sg+Loc:  laajoost
    lajo+N+Sg+Com:  laˊjoin
    lajo+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊjottáá
    lajo+N+Ess:  laijoon
    lajo+N+Par: laijood
    lajo+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊjoh
    lajo+N+Pl+Gen:  laˊjoi
    lajo+N+Pl+Acc:  laˊjoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Ill:  laˊjoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Loc:  laˊjoin
    lajo+N+Pl+Com:  laˊjoiguin
    lajo+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊjoittáá

  Noun - vajo: # ok LAJO
    vajo+N+Sg+Nom:  vaˊj̣o
    vajo+N+Sg+Gen:  vaˊjo
    vajo+N+Sg+Acc:  vaˊjo
    vajo+N+Sg+Ill:  vaˊj̣on
    vajo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaajoost
    vajo+N+Sg+Com:  vaˊjoin
    vajo+N+Sg+Abe:  vaˊjottáá
    vajo+N+Ess:  vaijoon
    vajo+N+Par:  vaijood
    vajo+N+Pl+Nom:  vaˊjoh
    vajo+N+Pl+Gen:  vaˊjoi
    vajo+N+Pl+Acc:  vaˊjoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Ill:  vaˊjoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Loc:  vaˊjoin
    vajo+N+Pl+Com:  vaˊjoiguin
    vajo+N+Pl+Abe:  vaˊjoittáá

  Noun - savo: # ? LAJO
    savo+N+Sg+Nom:  saˊṿo
    savo+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊvo
    savo+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊvo
    savo+N+Sg+Ill:  saˊṿon
    savo+N+Sg+Loc:  saavoost
    savo+N+Sg+Com:  saˊvoin
    savo+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊvottáá
    savo+N+Ess:  savvoon
    savo+N+Par: savvood
    savo+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊvoh
    savo+N+Pl+Gen:  saˊvoi
    savo+N+Pl+Acc:  saˊvoid
    savo+N+Pl+Ill:  savvoid
    savo+N+Pl+Loc:  saˊvoin
    savo+N+Pl+Com:  saˊvoiguin
    savo+N+Pl+Abe:  saˊvoittáá

  Noun - palo: # ? LAJO
    palo+N+Sg+Nom:  paˊḷo
    palo+N+Sg+Gen:  paˊlo
    palo+N+Sg+Acc:  paˊlo
    palo+N+Sg+Ill:  paˊḷon
    palo+N+Sg+Loc:  paaloost
    palo+N+Sg+Com:  paˊloin
    palo+N+Sg+Abe:  paˊlottáá
    palo+N+Ess:  palloon
    palo+N+Par:  pallood
    palo+N+Pl+Nom:  paˊloh
    palo+N+Pl+Gen:  paˊloi
    palo+N+Pl+Acc:  paˊloid
    palo+N+Pl+Ill:  paˊloid
    palo+N+Pl+Loc:  paˊloin
    palo+N+Pl+Com:  paˊloiguin
    palo+N+Pl+Abe:  paˊloittáá

  Noun - njamo: # ok LAJO
    njamo+N+Sg+Nom:  njaˊṃo
    njamo+N+Sg+Gen:  njaˊmo
    njamo+N+Sg+Acc:  njaˊmo
    njamo+N+Sg+Ill:  njaˊṃon
    njamo+N+Sg+Loc:  njaamoost
    njamo+N+Sg+Com:  njaˊmoin
    njamo+N+Sg+Abe:  njaˊmottáá
    njamo+N+Ess:  njammoon
    njamo+N+Par:  njammood
    njamo+N+Pl+Nom:  njaˊmoh
    njamo+N+Pl+Gen:  njaˊmoi
    njamo+N+Pl+Acc:  njaˊmoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Ill:  njaˊmoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Loc:  njaˊmoin
    njamo+N+Pl+Com:  njaˊmoiguin
    njamo+N+Pl+Abe:  njaˊmoittáá


  Noun - lahko:
    lahko+N+Sg+Nom:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊhko
    lahko+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊhko
    lahko+N+Sg+Ill:  laahkon
    lahko+N+Sg+Loc:  lahkoost
    lahko+N+Sg+Com:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊhkottáá
    lahko+N+Ess:  lahkon
    lahko+N+Par:  lahkod
    lahko+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊhkoh
    lahko+N+Pl+Gen:  laˊhkoi
    lahko+N+Pl+Acc:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Ill:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Loc:  laˊhkoin
    lahko+N+Pl+Com:  laˊhkoiguin
    lahko+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊhkoittáá

  Noun - saŋkko:
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Nom:  saŋkko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Ill:  saaŋkon
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Loc:  saŋkkoost
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Com:  saŋkkoin
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊŋkottáá
    saŋkko+N+Ess:  saŋkkon
    saŋkko+N+Par:  saŋkkod
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊŋkoh
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Gen:  saˊŋkoi
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Acc:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Ill:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Loc:  saˊŋkoin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Com:  saˊŋkoiguin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Abe:  saˊŋkoittáá

  Noun - jasko:
    jasko+N+Sg+Nom:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Gen:  jaˊsko
    jasko+N+Sg+Acc:  jaˊsko
    jasko+N+Sg+Ill:  jaaskon
    jasko+N+Sg+Loc:  jaskoost
    jasko+N+Sg+Com:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Sg+Abe:  jaˊskottáá
    jasko+N+Ess:  jaskon
    jasko+N+Par:  jaskod
    jasko+N+Pl+Nom:  jaˊskoh
    jasko+N+Pl+Gen:  jaˊskoi
    jasko+N+Pl+Acc:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Ill:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Loc:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Pl+Com:  jaˊskoiguin
    jasko+N+Pl+Abe:  jaˊskoittáá

  
  Noun - asto:
    asto+N+Sg+Nom:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill:  aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc:  astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com:  astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊstottáá
    asto+N+Ess:  aston
    asto+N+Par:  astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊstoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen:  aˊstoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc:  astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com:  aˊstoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe:  aˊstoittáá


  Noun - piano:
    piano+N+Sg+Nom:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Gen:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Acc:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Ill:  pianon
    piano+N+Sg+Loc:  pianost
    piano+N+Sg+Com:  pianoin
    piano+N+Sg+Abe:  pianottáá
    piano+N+Ess:  pianon
    piano+N+Par:  pianod
    piano+N+Pl+Nom:  pianoh
    piano+N+Pl+Gen:  pianoi
    piano+N+Pl+Acc:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Ill:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Loc:  pianoin
    piano+N+Pl+Com:  pianoiguin
    piano+N+Pl+Abe:  pianoittáá

  Noun - kerho:
    kerho+N+Sg+Nom:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Gen:  keˊrho
    kerho+N+Sg+Acc:  keˊrho
    kerho+N+Sg+Ill:  keerhon
    kerho+N+Sg+Loc:  kerhoost
    kerho+N+Sg+Com:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Sg+Abe:  keˊrhottáá
    kerho+N+Ess:  kerhon
    kerho+N+Par:  kerhod
    kerho+N+Pl+Nom:  keˊrhoh
    kerho+N+Pl+Gen:  keˊrhoi
    kerho+N+Pl+Acc:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Ill:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Loc:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Pl+Com:  keˊrhoiguin
    kerho+N+Pl+Abe:  keˊrhoittáá

  Noun - pircco:
    pircco+N+Sg+Nom:  pircco
    pircco+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊrco
    pircco+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊrco
    pircco+N+Sg+Ill:  piircon
    pircco+N+Sg+Loc:  pirccoost
    pircco+N+Sg+Com:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊrcottáá
    pircco+N+Ess:  pirccon
    pircco+N+Par:  pirccod
    pircco+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊrcoh
    pircco+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊrcoi
    pircco+N+Pl+Acc:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Ill:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊrcoin
    pircco+N+Pl+Com:  piˊrcoiguin
    pircco+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊrcoittáá

  Noun - riddo:
    riddo+N+Sg+Nom:  riddo
    riddo+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊdo
    riddo+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊdo
    riddo+N+Sg+Ill:  riidon
    riddo+N+Sg+Loc:  riddoost
    riddo+N+Sg+Com:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊdottáá
    riddo+N+Ess:  riddon
    riddo+N+Par:  riddod
    riddo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊdoh
    riddo+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊdoi
    riddo+N+Pl+Acc:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Ill:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊdoin
    riddo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊdoiguin
    riddo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊdoittáá

  Noun - rijdo:
    rijdo+N+Sg+Nom:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Gen:  [riˊjdo, riijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Acc:  [riˊjdo, riijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Ill:  riijdon
    rijdo+N+Sg+Loc: [riijdost, rijdoost]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Com:  rijdoin
    rijdo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊjdottáá
    rijdo+N+Ess:  rijdon
    rijdo+N+Par:  rijdod
    rijdo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊjdoh
    rijdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [riˊjdoi, riijdoi]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Acc:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Ill:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Loc:  [riˊjdoin, riijdoin]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊjdoiguin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊjdoittáá

  Noun - pivdo:
    pivdo+N+Sg+Nom:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊvdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊvdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Ill:  piivdon
    pivdo+N+Sg+Loc: [piivdost, pivdoost]
    pivdo+N+Sg+Com:  pivdoin
    pivdo+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊvdottáá
    pivdo+N+Ess:  pivdon
    pivdo+N+Par:  pivdod
    pivdo+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊvdoh
    pivdo+N+Pl+Gen: [piivdoi, piˊvdoi]
    pivdo+N+Pl+Acc:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Ill:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊvdoin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Com:  piˊvdoiguin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊvdoittáá

  Noun - šiljo:
    šiljo+N+Sg+Nom:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Gen:  šiˊljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Acc:  šiˊljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Ill:  šiiljon
    šiljo+N+Sg+Loc:  šiljoost
    šiljo+N+Sg+Com:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Sg+Abe:  šiˊljottáá
    šiljo+N+Ess:  šiljon
    šiljo+N+Par:  šiljod
    šiljo+N+Pl+Nom:  šiˊljoh
    šiljo+N+Pl+Gen:  šiˊljoi
    šiljo+N+Pl+Acc:  šiˊljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Ill:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Loc:  šiˊljoin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Com:  šiˊljoiguin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Abe:  šiˊljoittáá

  Noun - vihko:
    vihko+N+Sg+Nom:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Gen:  viˊhko
    vihko+N+Sg+Acc:  viˊhko
    vihko+N+Sg+Ill:  viihkon
    vihko+N+Sg+Loc:  vihkoost
    vihko+N+Sg+Com:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Sg+Abe:  viˊhkottáá
    vihko+N+Ess:  vihkon
    vihko+N+Par:  vihkod
    vihko+N+Pl+Nom:  viˊhkoh
    vihko+N+Pl+Gen:  viˊhkoi
    vihko+N+Pl+Acc:  viˊhkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Ill:  vihˊkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Loc:  viˊhkoin
    vihko+N+Pl+Com:  viˊhkoiguin
    vihko+N+Pl+Abe:  viˊhkoittáá

  Noun - kirkko:
    kirkko+N+Sg+Nom:  kirkko
    kirkko+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirkon
    kirkko+N+Sg+Loc:  kirhoost
    kirkko+N+Sg+Com:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊrhottáá
    kirkko+N+Ess:  kirkkon
    kirkko+N+Par:  kirkkod
    kirkko+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊrhoh
    kirkko+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊrhoi
    kirkko+N+Pl+Acc:  kiˊrhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Ill:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊrhoin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊrhoiguin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊrhoittáá
